Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 6 Georgia Family Caregiver Support

Cross references.

Georgia Caregivers Act,
§ 31-36B-1 et seq.

49-6-70.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Family Caregiver Support Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.

49-6-71.
Purpose.

The purpose of this article shall be to establish a comprehensive caregiver program which will marshal and integrate available resources and services to provide support and services to caregivers of chronically dependent adults. This article exists to coordinate assistance and maximize available services while maintaining and supporting existing services for caregivers. Such assistance may include:

Coordination and integration of information and services to caregivers in Georgia, including, but not limited to, insurance and benefits counseling, respite services available under the community care services program, the state respite or adult day-care program, or the Older Americans Act of 1965, as amended, and coordination with educational and other services offered by the caregiver resource center;

Assistance to the caregiver to assure that supports to the functionally dependent older adult or adult suffering from dementia are adequate and appropriate to maintain these individuals in the home;

Intermittent, planned, or emergency relief to the caregiver, either directly or through use of other available resources and services;

Restoration or maintenance of the caregiver’s well-being;

Preservation of the caregiver’s informal supports such as family and friends;

Supportive social services to the caregiver; and

Affordable services through a cost-sharing mechanism developed by the Division of Aging Services of the department for those families whose household incomes do not exceed 400 percent of the federal poverty level.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The federal Older Americans Act of 1965, referred to in paragraph (1), is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 3001

et seq.

49-6-72.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Adult” means a person 18 years of age or older residing within the State of Georgia who is a functionally dependent older adult or who is suffering from dementia, such as Alzheimer’s disease.

“Area agency on aging” means the single local agency designated by the Division of Aging Services of the department within each planning and service area to administer the delivery of a comprehensive and coordinated plan of social and other services and activities in the planning and service area.

“Dementia” means: (A) an irreversible global loss of cognitive function causing evident intellectual impairment which always includes memory loss, without alteration of state of consciousness, as diagnosed by a physician, and is severe enough to interfere with work or social activities, or both, and to require continuous care or supervision; or (B) the comatose state of an adult resulting from any head injury.

“Department” means the Department of Human Services.

“Functionally dependent older adult” means a person 60 years of age or older residing within the State of Georgia who, because of his or her inability to perform tasks required for daily living, as defined by the department and as may be assessed through an area agency on aging or community care assessment team, needs continuous care and supervision.

“Home modification” means reasonable modifications to the structure of a home for the purpose of reducing the caregiving burden of the caregiver, as approved by the department, but does not include repairs and payment for such repairs.

“Household income” means the income of all members of a household with the exception of a minor or dependent student.

“Income” means all income, from whatever source derived, including, but not limited to, wages, salaries, social security or railroad retirement income, public assistance income, realized capital gains, and workers’ compensation. The department shall determine income amounts and inclusions for the purposes of this article through regulation.

“Primary caregiver” means the one identified relative or other person in a relationship of responsibility, such as an agent under a valid durable power of attorney for health care, a health care agent under a valid advance directive for health care, or a mental health care agent under a valid psychiatric advance directive, who has assumed the primary responsibility for the provision of care needed to maintain the physical or mental health of a functionally dependent older adult or other adult suffering from dementia, who lives in the same residence with such individual, and who does not receive financial compensation for the care provided. A substantiated case of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, as defined in Chapter 5 of Title 30, the “Disabled Adults and Elder Persons Protection Act,” or pursuant to any other civil or criminal statute regarding an older adult, shall prohibit a primary caregiver from receiving benefits under this article unless authorized by the department to prevent further abuse.

“Relative” means a spouse, parent, child, stepparent, stepchild, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, half-brother, half-sister, aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, niece, or nephew by blood, marriage, or adoption.

“Respite care service” means a regular, intermittent, or emergency service which provides the primary caregiver of a functionally dependent older adult or other adult suffering from dementia with relief from normal caregiving duties and responsibilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 18/HB 24; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 49/HB 79; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-30/HB 752.

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, inserted “of age” near the beginning of paragraph (1).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence in paragraph (9), substituted “health care, a health care agent” for “health care or health care agent”, and inserted “or a mental health care agent under a valid psychiatric advance directive,”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, “workers’ ” was substituted for “worker’s” in the first sentence in paragraph (8).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “Disabled Adults and Elder Persons Protection Act” was substituted for “Disabled Adults Protection Act” in the last sentence of paragraph (9).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

49-6-73.
Eligibility for benefits; contracts; identification of services.

The persons to be served under this article are primary caregivers who provide continuous care to a functionally dependent older adult or other adult suffering from dementia, such as Alzheimer’s disease.

The department shall develop operating procedures and guidelines and shall contract with or through area agencies on aging to provide benefits set forth in this article. The department may also contract with other support centers or service providers directly, where such service is provided on a state-wide basis or where necessary or appropriate. The department shall have the authority to develop criteria through regulation relating to eligibility for primary caregivers to receive assistance pursuant to this article.

The department shall identify supportive services which are directly related to the provision of care to a functionally dependent older adult or other adult suffering from dementia. Supportive services include, but are not limited to:

Benefits counseling and caregiver counseling, education, and training;

Reimbursement to primary caregivers whose households financially qualify for assistance pursuant to Code Section 49-6-74 and as developed by regulation of the department for expenses incurred in obtaining day or night respite care services, transportation to respite care service locations, or other supportive services defined by regulation, and consumable supplies such as incontinence pads; and

Reimbursement to primary caregivers whose households financially qualify for assistance pursuant to Code Section 49-6-74 and as developed by regulation for expenses incurred in obtaining home modifications or assistive devices, as approved by the department, such as grab bars, safety devices, and wheelchair ramps, which help the functionally dependent older adult or adult suffering from dementia carry out tasks required for daily living.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.

49-6-74.
Provision of services; reimbursement of caregivers; maximum amounts available.

The department, through contracts with or through area agencies on aging and other appropriate entities, shall provide the services described in paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-6-73 and shall reimburse qualified primary caregivers for purchase of approved services, equipment, and supplies described in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-6-73.

The maximum amount available to a qualified primary caregiver whose household income is under 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be established by regulation. The department shall be responsible for developing allowable cost ranges for services and supplies under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-6-73, including the development of maximum amounts available per month to a caregiver, where necessary.

The maximum amount available to a qualified caregiver whose household income is under 200 percent of federal poverty level shall be established by regulation but shall not exceed $2,000.00 for the entire duration of the case for expenses incurred for home modifications or assistive devices as described in paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Code Section 49-6-73.

A sliding benefits scale shall be established by the department by regulation to ensure that caregivers who qualify under this article and whose household income exceeds 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall pay some portions of the out-of-pocket expenses for services, equipment, and supplies described in subsection (c) of Code Section 49-6-73. In no event will persons whose household income exceeds 400 percent of the federal poverty level be considered eligible for state funded services, equipment, or supplies under this article but such persons may purchase such services through this program by paying the entire cost of such services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.

49-6-75.
Entitlements not created.

Nothing in this article creates or provides any individual with an entitlement to services, equipment, and supplies or benefits which will be made available only to the extent of the availability and level of appropriations made by the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.

49-6-76.
Displacement of other programs prohibited.

Funding authorized under this article shall not be used to displace benefits, entitlements, or resources available under other programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.

49-6-77.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-6-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 455, § 1.